Utah statutes.
72-5-106.   Expiration of franchise of toll bridge or road.

If the franchise of any toll bridge or road expires by limitation, forfeiture, or nonuser it is a free public highway, and no claim shall be valid against the public for right-of-way or for land or material comprising the bridge or road.

